Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.140

Nonrecourse revenue bonds—Contracts—Restrictions.

(1) Bonds issued by the authority under this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute obligations, either general, special or moral, of the state or of any political subdivision of the state, or pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision, or general obligations of the authority. The bonds shall be special obligations of the authority and shall be payable solely from the special fund or funds created by the authority for their repayment. The issuance of bonds under this chapter shall not obligate, directly, indirectly, or contingently, the state or any political subdivision of the state to levy any taxes or appropriate or expend any funds for the payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds. The substance of the limitations included in this paragraph shall be plainly printed, written, engraved, or reproduced on each bond and in any disclosure document prepared in conjunction with the offer and sale of bonds.

(2) Neither the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter nor any money used or to be used to pay the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on the bonds shall constitute public money or property. All of such money shall be kept segregated and set apart from funds of the state and any political subdivision of the state and shall not be subject to appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

(3) Contracts entered into by the authority shall be entered into in the name of the authority and not in the name of the state. The obligations of the authority under such contracts shall be obligations only of the authority and shall not, in any way, constitute obligations of the state.

[ 1989 c 279 s 15.]